Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1717.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MELISSA AND MARK HORTMAN MEMORIAL STATE PARK WORKING GROUP.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Melissa and Mark Hortman Memorial State Park working group. new text end new text begin (a) The Melissa and Mark Hortman Memorial State Park working group consists of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) the governor or the governor's designee; new text end new text begin (2) the commissioner of administration or the commissioner's designee; new text end new text begin (3) the commissioner of natural resources or the commissioner's designee; new text end new text begin (4) the chair of the Capitol Area Architectural and Planning Board or the chair's designee; new text end new text begin (5) the executive director of the Minnesota Historical Society or the executive director's designee; new text end new text begin (6) the chairs and ranking minority members of the senate committees with primary jurisdiction over the Department of Administration and Department of Natural Resources or their designees; new text end new text begin (7) the co-chairs of the house of representatives committees with primary jurisdiction over the Department of Administration and Department of Natural Resources or their designees; and new text end new text begin (8) the mayor of the city of St. Paul or the mayor's designee. new text end new text begin (b) Appointing authorities must submit their appointments to the executive director of the Legislative Coordinating Commission no later than July 15, 2026. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Recommendations. new text end new text begin The working group must make recommendations for the creation of the Melissa and Mark Hortman Memorial State Park within the Capitol Area as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 15B.02, including: new text end new text begin (1) identifying the roles and responsibilities of the commissioners of administration and natural resources, the Minnesota Historical Society, and the Capitol Area Architectural and Planning Board related to the administration of the park, including assigning the roles and responsibilities for providing educational programming, interpretive services, planning processes for physical changes, and public engagement activities within the park; and new text end new text begin (2) funding recommendations for establishing and maintaining the park and related programming. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Chair. new text end new text begin The working group must elect a chair at its first meeting from among its legislative members. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Administrative support; meetings. new text end new text begin (a) The Legislative Coordinating Commission must provide administrative support and convene the first meeting by August 15, 2026. new text end new text begin (b) The working group must meet at regular intervals as often as necessary to develop the recommendations under subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Per diem; expenses. new text end new text begin Members of the working group serve without pay, except that legislative members may receive per diem from their respective legislative bodies according to the rules of their respective legislative bodies. All members may be reimbursed for expenses incurred as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 15.059, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin By February 1, 2027, the working group must submit a written report containing its recommendations to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate committees with primary jurisdiction over the Department of Administration and the Department of Natural Resources. The report must include draft legislation, if needed, to implement the recommendations of the working group. The working group expires March 15, 2027, or upon submission of the report required by this subdivision, whichever occurs later. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $86,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the Legislative Coordinating Commission for the administrative costs of the Melissa and Mark Hortman Memorial State Park working group. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end